Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-905
County budget; budget document; forms; preparation; Auditor of Public Accounts; duties; expenses.

The form of the county budget and the form of the budget document, as required by the County Budget Act of 1937, shall be formulated by the Auditor of Public Accounts and the Attorney General. The Auditor of Public Accounts shall draft the forms and act in an advisory capacity in the preparation of the budget and may authorize the use of computer equipment and processing in the preparation of the budget. He or she shall transmit copies of the forms to the county clerk of each county in the state on or before July 15 of each year. Any hospital established pursuant to section 23-3501 may file its budget on an accrual basis. The budget document form shall include such estimate blanks for the various offices and departments of the county and such other additional forms as the Auditor of Public Accounts or the Attorney General deems necessary in the computation and preparation of the county budget. The expense of printing and transmitting the required copies to the counties by the Auditor of Public Accounts shall be borne by the state and included in the proper appropriation.

Laws 1939, c. 24, § 2, p. 126;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-2104;

R.S.1943, § 23-905;

Laws 1945, c. 45, § 5, p. 214;

Laws 1987, LB 183, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 366, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 692, § 5.